Massachusetts, session 194th, H3901.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or specific law to the
contrary, the position of Assistant Fire Chief in the Town of Natick shall be exempt from the
provisions of Chapter 31 of the General Laws.
SECTION 2. The provisions of section 1 shall not impair the civil service status of any
person holding the position of Assistant Fire Chief of the Town of Natick on the effective date of
this act.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
of 1